Illinois, session 104th, SB25.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Swimming Facility Act is amended by 5changing Section 3 and by adding Sections 3.25 and 21.2 as 6follows: 7    (210 ILCS 125/3)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1203)8    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 9context otherwise requires, the terms specified in Sections 103.01 through 3.25 3.24 have the meanings ascribed to them in 11those Sections.12(Source: P.A. 96-1081, eff. 7-16-10; 97-957, eff. 1-1-13.) 13    (210 ILCS 125/3.25 new)14    Sec. 3.25. Cold spa. "Cold spa" means a basin of water that 15is maintained at a temperature of not less than 40 degrees 16Fahrenheit and not greater than 92 degrees Fahrenheit. "Cold 17Spa" does not include the use or installation of portable, 18manufactured, or commercially available cold spas unless they 19comply with the provisions of this Act. 20    (210 ILCS 125/21.2 new)21    Sec. 21.2. Operation of cold spa. It is lawful for a   SB0025 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 07069 BAB 17106 b1licensee to operate a cold spa in a manner that complies with 2the provisions of this Act, subject to the following 3conditions:4        (1) the licensee must operate as a physical fitness 5    facility in compliance with the Physical Fitness Facility 6    Medical Emergency Preparedness Act;7        (2) the licensee must display a sign posted in a 8    conspicuous position in immediate proximity to the cold 9    spa warning users about the risks associated with the use 10    of cold spas and recommended guidelines, including, but 11    not limited to, the duration of time for the use of cold 12    spas;13        (3) the licensee must prohibit use of the cold spa by 14    children under the age of 14;15        (4) the licensee must ensure that there is an employee 16    on staff during staffed business hours that is trained in 17    recognizing the signs and symptoms of hypothermia;18        (5) the licensee must have at least one hypothermic 19    thermometer or electronic thermometer capable of aiding in 20    the diagnosis of hypothermia on the facility premises;21        (6) the licensee must include a non-slip deck or mat 22    around the entrance and exit of the cold spa;23        (7) the licensee must install a clock or timer in a 24    conspicuous location that can be viewed from anywhere in 25    the cold spa; and26        (8) the water must be continuously filtered or   SB0025 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 07069 BAB 17106 b1    sanitized, or the water must be drained and replaced with 2    sanitized water between each use.